Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section and section 2 of this 2017 Act:
(a) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109, excluding courts.
(b) “Social services” means:
(A) Health care services;
(B) Mental health services;
(C) Substance abuse treatment services;
(D) Educational services;
(E) Juvenile justice services;
(F) Adult correctional services;
(G) Employment services; and
(H) Human services.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall convene a work group to  study and develop
a common and comprehensive client confidentiality release form that may be used by  public
bodies and community organizations that provide  social services to enable and facilitate the
appropriate sharing of confidential information to enhance the delivery of social services in
this state.
Enrolled Senate Bill 397 (SB 397-A) Page 1
(3) Members of the work group shall include:
(a) Representatives from the Department of Justice;
(b) Representatives from other public bodies that  receive, create or use confidential in-
formation relating to the provision of social services;
(c) Representatives  of community organizations that receive, create or use confidential
information relating to the provision of social services;
(d) Representatives of law enforcement;
(e) Representatives of civil liberty interest organizations; and
(f) Other interested stakeholders.
(4) The Department of Human Services shall convene the work  group as soon as practi-
cable after the effective date  of this 2017 Act and shall develop the release form for adoption
and use by public bodies and community organizations in this state that  provide social ser-
vices by July 1, 2018.
(5) The Department of Human Services shall provide facilities  and administrative support
for meetings of the work group.
(6) The Department of Human Services  shall report to those committees of the 2018
regular session of  the Legislative Assembly having jurisdiction over human services and
health care on the progress of the work group in the development of the release form.
SECTION 2.
(1) During 2017 and 2018, the  Department of Justice, in consultation with the
Department of Human Services and other public bodies and community  organizations that
receive, create or use confidential information related to the  provision of social services,
shall review state laws and  identify those state statutes that could be modified to better fa-
cilitate communication between and among public  bodies and community organizations en-
gaged in the provision of social services.
(2) The  Department of Justice shall submit any legislative proposals for modifications
described in subsection (1) of  this section in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.130 for in-
troduction in the 2019 regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 3. (1) The Department of Justice shall develop and  maintain an information
sharing guide setting forth the applicable state and federal laws  governing the release of
educational, juvenile justice, adult correctional, mental  health treatment, substance abuse
treatment and health care information.  The guide must set forth the applicable laws ac-
cording to discipline, including but not limited to the release of information by child welfare
agencies, law enforcement, juvenile justice agencies, schools, mental health treatment  pro-
viders, health care providers, substance abuse treatment providers and human services pro-
viders.
(2) The guide must be  made available on the Department of Justice website by December
31, 2018, and must be updated annually in accordance with changes in the law.
(3) The Department of Justice shall  make efforts to notify affected entities of the avail-
ability of the guide by January 1, 2019.
SECTION 4.
 Section 3 of this 2017 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) The Department of Justice  shall [ develop and ] maintain an information sharing guide
setting forth the applicable state and federal laws governing the  release of educational, juvenile
justice, adult correctional, mental health treatment, substance abuse treatment and health care  in-
formation. The guide must  set forth the applicable laws according to discipline, including but not
limited to the release of information by child  welfare agencies, law enforcement, juvenile justice
agencies, schools, mental health  treatment providers, health care providers, substance abuse treat-
ment providers and human services providers.
(2) The guide must be made available on the Department  of Justice website [ by December 31,
2018, and must be ] and updated annually in accordance with changes in the law.
[(3) The Department of Justice shall make efforts to notify affected entities of the availability of the
guide by January 1, 2019. ]
SECTION 5. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2017 Act are repealed.
Enrolled Senate Bill 397 (SB 397-A) Page 2
SECTION 6. The amendments to section 3 of this 2017 Act by section 4 of this 2017 Act
and the repeal of sections 1 and 2 of this 2017 Act by section 5 of this 2017 Act become  op-
erative on January 2, 2019.
SECTION 7. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 28, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 397 (SB 397-A) Page 3